Illinois, session 104th, SB2284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-442 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-442 new)8    Sec. 2705-442. Intercity bus program. The Department shall 9create an intercity bus program with the purpose of connecting 10the State with quality, affordable travel options that allow 11people to travel to any part of the State without driving. The 12Department shall plan for and implement intercity bus routes 13that (i) add missing frequencies to existing passenger rail 14routes, (ii) begin frequent departures throughout the day in 15advance of Amtrak service, and (iii) add smaller towns into 16the network.17    Bus schedules shall be coordinated with intercity and 18commuter trains so that passengers can conveniently connect 19between buses and trains. Passengers shall be able to purchase 20a single ticket for journeys combining intercity buses and 21intercity trains. Bus-only tickets shall be available for 22purchase from the same ticketing system used by intercity 23trains.  SB2284- 2 -LRB104 10754 LNS 20833 b1    The Department may implement the program by (i) 2contracting directly with intercity bus carriers through 3competitive bids, (ii) contracting through Amtrak's Thruway 4bus program, or (iii) contract directly with a local transit 5authority within the State.